District of Columbia statutes.
2-1402.12

Exception.

(a)

It shall not be an unlawful discriminatory practice for an employer to observe the conditions of a bona fide seniority system or a bona fide employee benefit system such as retirement, pension or insurance plan which is not a subterfuge to evade the purposes of this chapter, except that no such employee seniority system or benefit plan shall excuse the failure to hire any individual.

(b)

It shall not be an unlawful discriminatory practice for the District of Columbia to prescribe minimum and maximum age limits for appointment to the police officer and firefighter cadet programs.

Dec. 13, 1977, D.C. Law 2-38, title II, § 212, 24 DCR 6038
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-172, § 4(a), 29 DCR 5745
1981 Ed., § 1-2513.
1973 Ed., § 6-2222.